Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,197.07
Driving under influence of alcoholic liquor or drugs; implied consent to submit to chemical test; city or village ordinances; authorized.

Any city or village may enact ordinances in conformance with sections 60-6,196 and 60-6,197. Upon conviction of any person of a violation of such a city or village ordinance, the provisions of sections 60-6,197.02 and 60-6,197.03 with respect to the operator's license of such person shall be applicable the same as though it were a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197.

Laws 2004, LB 208, § 17.